src/morphology/stems/numeral.lexc
LEXICON NUM_51kuusikahdeksatta

+Pl+Abe:sittakahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:siltakahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:sillakahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:sillekahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:sinekahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:sistakahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:sinakahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:sienkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:siinkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:sissakahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:detkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:siakahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:siksikahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:dettakahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:deltakahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:dellakahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:dellekahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:destakahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:tenakahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:denkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:teenkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:dessakahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:sikahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:ttakahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:deksikahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51kuusikiljardia

+Pl+Abe:sittakiljardeitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:siltakiljardeilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:sillakiljardeilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:sillekiljardeille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:sinekiljardeine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:sistakiljardeista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:sinakiljardeina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:sienkiljardien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:siinkiljardeihin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:sissakiljardeissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:sinkiljardein  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:detkiljardit  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:siakiljardeja  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:siksikiljardeiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:dettakiljarditta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:deltakiljardilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:dellakiljardilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:dellekiljardille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:destakiljardista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:tenakiljardina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:denkiljardin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:teenkiljardiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:dessakiljardissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:sikiljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:ttakiljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:deksikiljardiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51kuusikiljoonaa

+Pl+Abe:sittakiljoonitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:siltakiljoonilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:sillakiljoonilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:sillekiljoonille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:sinekiljoonine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:sistakiljoonista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:sinakiljoonina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:sienkiljoonien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:siinkiljooniin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:sissakiljoonissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:sinkiljoonin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:detkiljoonat  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:siakiljoonia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:siksikiljooniksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:dettakiljoonatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:deltakiljoonalta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:dellakiljoonalla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:dellekiljoonalle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:destakiljoonasta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:tenakiljoonana  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:denkiljoonan  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:teenkiljoonaan  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:dessakiljoonassa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:sikiljoonaa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:ttakiljoonaa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:deksikiljoonaksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51kuusikolmatta

+Pl+Abe:sittakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:siltakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:sillakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:sillekolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:sinekolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:sistakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:sinakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:sienkolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:siinkolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:sissakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:detkolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:siakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:siksikolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:dettakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:deltakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:dellakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:dellekolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:destakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:tenakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:denkolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:teenkolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:dessakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:sikolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:ttakolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:deksikolmatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51kuusikuudetta

+Pl+Abe:sittakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:siltakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:sillakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:sillekuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:sinekuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:sistakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:sinakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:sienkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:siinkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:sissakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:detkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:siakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:siksikuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:dettakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:deltakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:dellakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:dellekuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:destakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:tenakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:denkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:teenkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:dessakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:sikuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:ttakuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:deksikuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51kuusikvadriljardia

+Pl+Abe:sittakvadriljardeitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:siltakvadriljardeilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:sillakvadriljardeilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:sillekvadriljardeille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:sinekvadriljardeine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:sistakvadriljardeista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:sinakvadriljardeina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:sienkvadriljardien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:siinkvadriljardeihin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:sissakvadriljardeissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:sinkvadriljardein  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:detkvadriljardit  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:siakvadriljardeja  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:siksikvadriljardeiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:dettakvadriljarditta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:deltakvadriljardilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:dellakvadriljardilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:dellekvadriljardille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:destakvadriljardista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:tenakvadriljardina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:denkvadriljardin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:teenkvadriljardiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:dessakvadriljardissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:sikvadriljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:ttakvadriljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:deksikvadriljardiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

LEXICON NUMERAL
kuusikahdeksatta+Num:kuu  NUM_51kuusikahdeksatta  ;
kuusikiljardia+Num:kuu  NUM_51kuusikiljardia  ;
kuusikiljoonaa+Num:kuu  NUM_51kuusikiljoonaa  ;
kuusikolmatta+Num:kuu  NUM_51kuusikolmatta  ;
kuusikuudetta+Num:kuu  NUM_51kuusikuudetta  ;
kuusikvadriljardia+Num:kuu  NUM_51kuusikvadriljardia  ;
